Washington statutes.
RCW 33.04.020

Director—Powers and duties.

The director:

(1) Shall be charged with the administration and enforcement of this title and shall have and exercise all powers necessary or convenient thereunto;

(2) Shall issue to each association doing business hereunder, when it shall have paid its annual license fee and be duly qualified otherwise, a certificate of authority authorizing it to transact business;

(3) Shall require of each association an annual statement and such other reports and statements as the director deems desirable, on forms to be furnished by the director;

(4) Shall require each association to conduct its business in compliance with the provisions of this title;

(5) Shall visit and examine into the affairs of every association, at least once in each biennium; may appraise and revalue its investments and securities; and shall have full access to all the books, records, papers, securities, correspondence, bank accounts, and other papers of such association for such purposes. The director may accept in lieu of an examination the report of the examining division of the federal home loan bank board, or the report of the savings and loan department of another state, which has made and submitted a report of the condition of the affairs of the association, and if approved, the report shall have the same force and effect as though the examination were made by the director or one of his or her appointees;

(6) May accept or exchange any information or reports with the examining division of the federal home loan bank board or other like agency which may insure the accounts in an association or to which an association may belong or with the savings and loan department of another state which has authority to examine any association doing business in this state;

(7) May visit and examine into the affairs of any nonpublicly-held corporation in which the association has a material investment and any publicly-held corporation the capital stock of which is controlled by the association; may appraise and revalue its investments and securities; and shall have full access to all the books, records, papers, securities, correspondence, bank accounts, and other papers of such corporation for such purposes;

(8) May, in the director's discretion, administer oaths to and to examine any person under oath concerning the affairs of any association or nonpublicly-held corporation in which the association has a material investment and any publicly-held corporation the capital stock of which is controlled by an association and, in connection therewith, to issue subpoenas and require the attendance and testimony of any person or persons at any place within this state, and to require witnesses to produce any books, papers, documents, or other things under their control material to such examination; and

(9) Shall have power to commence and prosecute actions and proceedings to enforce the provisions of this title, to enjoin violations thereof, and to collect sums due to the state of Washington from any association.

[ 1994 c 92 s 416; 1982 c 3 s 4; 1979 c 113 s 1; 1973 c 130 s 22; 1945 c 235 s 95; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-214. Prior: 1933 c 183 ss 79, 94, 95; 1919 c 169 s 12; 1913 c 110 s 19; 1890 p 56 s 19.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1979 c 113: "If any provision of this 1979 act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1979 c 113 s 17.]

Severability—1973 c 130: See note following RCW 33.24.350.